Arkansas, session 2025, SB623.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 12-32-103(a) concerning the provision of
prenatal nutrition and hygiene products to a pregnant inmate, is amended to
read as follows:
(a) A correctional or detention facility shall establish a policy for
providing:
(1) Necessary prenatal vitamins and nutrition for pregnant
inmates and detainees, including without limitation timely and regular
nutritious meals that provide, at minimum, two thousand five hundred (2,500)
calories in total per day;
(2) A necessary number of hygiene products for female inmates
and detainees;
*CEB291*
04-08-2025 10:53:17 CEB291

As Engrossed: S4/8/25 SB623
(3) A necessary number of undergarments for female inmates and
detainees;
(4) A lower bunk for a pregnant inmate or detainee; and
(5) Unless otherwise provided for by the correctional or
detention facility, access for a pregnant inmate or detainee to:
(A) nonprofit Nonprofit educational programming, such as
prenatal care, pregnancy-specific hygiene, and parenting classes; and
(B) Substance abuse treatment; and
(6) Unless otherwise provided for by the correctional or
detention facility, a female medical provider or a female member of staff of
the correctional or detention facility to be present during a medical
examination of a pregnant inmate or detainee.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 12-32-104(c), concerning the placement of a
pregnant inmate in restrictive housing, is amended to read as follows:
(c) A pregnant inmate or detainee or an inmate or detainee who has
delivered a child within the previous thirty (30) days may not be placed in
restrictive housing for any length of time unless the correctional or
detention facility determines that the pregnant inmate's or detainee's
continued presence in the general population of the correctional or detention
facility poses:
(1) A direct threat to:
(A) The safety of a person; or
(B) An unborn child or children; or
(2) A clear threat to the safe and secure operations of the
correctional or detention facility.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 12, Chapter 32, is amended to add an
additional section to read as follows:
12-32-106. Safety of pregnant inmate or detainee during transport.
A pregnant inmate or detainee shall be transported in a vehicle
equipped with seatbelts.

/s/J. Scott


04-08-2025 10:53:17 CEB291